Massachusetts, session 194th, H2450.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
1  SECTION 1. Chapter 10 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
2 section 35SSS the following section:-  
3  Section 35TTT. (a) As used in this section, the following words, unless the context 
4 clearly requires otherwise, shall have the following meanings:-   
5  “Ambient air”, that portion of the atmosphere, external to buildings, to which the general 
6 public has access. 
7  “Board of health”, any body politic or political subdivision of the commonwealth that 
8 acts as a board of health, public health commission or a health department for a municipality, 
9 region or district, including, but not limited to, municipal boards of health, regional health 

2 of 30 10 districts established pursuant to G.L. c. 111, § 27B and boards of health that share services 
11 pursuant to G.L. c. 40, § 4A or other legally constituted governmental unit within the 
12 Commonwealth having the usual powers and duties of the board of health of a city or town.  
13  “Commissioner”, the commissioner of the department of environmental protection  
14  “Department”, the department of environmental protection 
15  “Fund”, the PFAS Remediation Trust Fund established in this section.  
16  “Per- and polyfluoroalkyl substances” or “PFAS”, as defined and regulated by the 
17 department or identified, on the basis of a health assessment conducted pursuant to the 
18 department’s drinking water regulations, as posing an unacceptable health risk to consumers.  
19  “Regional system”, any system established by mutual agreement of two or more 
20 municipalities or a county in which all municipalities of said county have an agreement where 
21 such system provides drinking water or wastewater services, or both, through shared facilities, 
22 sources or distribution networks.   
23   (b) (1) There shall be a PFAS Remediation Trust Fund. Expenditures from the 
24 fund shall be made by the department, without further appropriation and consistent with this 
25 section, the terms of settlements, judgments, and awards made in connection with claims arising 
26 from the manufacture, marketing or sale of PFAS and PFAS-containing products, and consistent 
27 with the terms of other allocations and monies transferred to this fund, as applicable. The 
28 commissioner shall administer the fund, shall prioritize expenditures to communities with 
29 vulnerable environmental justice populations, and may make expenditures from the fund to 

3 of 30 30 develop and implement a multilingual outreach and education program pursuant to section 29 of 
31 chapter 21A of the General Laws. 
32  (2) The fund shall be expended to mitigate the impacts of PFAS contamination in the 
33 commonwealth, including PFAS contamination in drinking water, groundwater, soil, sediment, 
34 surface water, wastewater, sludge or sludge products, landfills, and other media as appropriate. 
35 Such mitigation may include, but is not limited to, projects to assist counties municipalities, 
36 private well owners, and public water systems with the cost of PFAS treatment and remediation, 
37 including but not limited to remediation projects, treatment, and mitigation. The commissioner 
38 shall make necessary expenditures from this account for the shared administrative costs of the 
39 operations and programs of the department related to the fund. The commissioner shall further 
40 direct that monies from the fund shall be expended to provide services in an amount reasonably 
41 related to such administrative costs. No expenditure shall be made from the fund that would 
42 cause the fund to be in deficit at the close of a fiscal year. Amounts credited to the fund shall not 
43 be subject to further appropriation and monies remaining in the fund at the end of the fiscal year 
44 shall not revert to the General Fund but shall instead be available for expenditure during 
45 subsequent fiscal years. Any fiscal year-end balance in the fund shall be excluded from the 
46 calculation of the consolidated net surplus pursuant to section 5C of chapter 29 of the General 
47 Laws.  
48  (3) There shall be credited to the fund: (i) amounts recovered by the commonwealth and 
49 credited thereto in connection with claims arising from the manufacture and associated 
50 processes, distribution, marketing, or sale of PFAS and other PFAS-containing products; (ii) 
51 transfers from other funds authorized by the general court and so designated; (iii) funds from 
52 public or private sources, including, but not limited to, gifts, grants, donations, rebates, 

4 of 30 53 settlements, judgments, awards, and other allocations received by the commonwealth designated 
54 to the fund; and (iv) any interest earned on such amounts.  
55  (c) The commissioner may award and administer grants from the fund, without further 
56 appropriation, consistent with the purposes of the fund described in this section. Further, subject 
57 to this section, grants may be made, without limitation, to: (i) municipalities and counties for 
58 municipal and county use, including, but not limited to, establishing connections to regional 
59 systems and funds necessary to address the reasonable administrative costs of the municipality; 
60 (ii) boards of health for use in assisting private well users; (iii) community water systems for use 
61 on an existing system or to expand a system to assist additional water users; (iv) non-transient 
62 non-community water systems; and (v) transient non-community water systems.  
63  (d) The department shall adopt regulations, rules, or policies for the use of monies in the 
64 fund, and shall include conditions in grant documents to require that that applicants disclose any 
65 funds recovered from liable third parties or other sources to cover any costs eligible to be 
66 reimbursed by said grant programs and to deduct said recovered funds from the total costs in the 
67 grant application. The department shall also require any person awarded a grant for cost 
68 reimbursement to report the recovery of any such costs in the future and to reimburse the fund by 
69 reimbursing such recovered costs to the department. The department shall further adopt 
70 regulations, rules, or policies establishing criteria to ensure that an applicant shall not be eligible 
71 for grants for any project or portion of a project to the extent the negligence of the applicant 
72 caused the contamination that resulted in the exceedance of applicable state or federal standards 
73 for PFAS in drinking water, groundwater, soil, and other environmental media.  

5 of 30 74  (e) If the department provides a grant related to costs for a project for which a third party 
75 might otherwise be liable, the right to recover payment from such third party, excluding public 
76 sector fire departments for the use of Class B firefighting foam in emergency responses, shall be 
77 subrogated to the department to the extent of such grant. Any money recovered by the 
78 department from such third parties shall be deposited in the fund. Notwithstanding any other 
79 general or special law to the contrary, the superior court shall have jurisdiction for subrogation 
80 claims brought pursuant to this chapter, and civil actions brought by the attorney general for 
81 subrogated claims to recover costs pursuant to this chapter shall be commenced within five years 
82 from the date the commonwealth is assigned the rights to recover all such costs or five years 
83 from the date the commonwealth discovers that the person against whom the action is being 
84 brought is a person liable pursuant to law, whichever is later. 
85  (f)(1) The department may consult with the department of public health to provide 
86 funding from the fund for boards of health to establish rebate and grant programs for the 
87 reimbursement of private well users and owners for the costs of private well water sampling, 
88 installation, and operation and maintenance of PFAS treatment systems. Eligible spending for 
89 rebate shall include, but is not limited to, sampling of private well water for those PFAS that are 
90 regulated for public water systems by the department’s drinking water regulations and 
91 installation of permanent treatment systems to remove PFAS from drinking water 
92  (2) Boards of health may elect to receive funding from the fund pursuant to any program 
93 established pursuant to paragraph (1), and may apply for and receive grants from the fund 
94 necessary to cover reasonable administrative costs related to implementation of said paragraph 
95 (1). Boards of health that elect to participate shall amend their codes to require private well water 

6 of 30 96 quality testing for PFAS for property sales and new construction consistent with model bylaws 
97 and ordinances provided by the department through program guidance.  
98  (3) Annually, not later than August 31, boards of health that elect to participate pursuant 
99 to paragraph (2) shall submit a report to the department including information demonstrating 
100 compliance during the preceding fiscal year with said paragraph (2) and other such information 
101 as required by the department. 
102  (g) Annually, not later than October 1, the department shall file a report on the activity, 
103 revenue and expenditures to and from the fund in the prior fiscal year with the clerks of the 
104 house of representatives and the senate and the house and senate committees on ways and means, 
105 and shall make the report available on the department’s website. The report shall include, but not 
106 be limited to: (i) revenue credited to the fund; (ii) the amount of expenditure attributable to the 
107 administrative costs of the department; (iii) an itemized list of expenditures from the fund; (iv) 
108 rebate and grant expenditures to private well users and owners and municipal administrative 
109 expenses of boards of health opting into such rebate and grant programs; and (v) data and a 
110 report of how resources have been directed to environmental justice populations.  
111  SECTION 2. Chapter 21 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
112 section 43A the following section:-  
113  Section 43B. (a) The department of environmental protection shall amend each 
114 groundwater discharge permit upon renewal with requirements for monitoring and reporting of 
115 per- and polyfluoroalkyl substances using United States Environmental Protection Agency 
116 analytical methods as specified by the department.  

7 of 30 117  (b) The department of environmental protection shall amend its surface water discharge 
118 permits issued to industrial permittees and groundwater discharge permits issued to industrial 
119 permittees upon renewal with requirements to implement best management practices for 
120 discharges of PFAS, including, but not limited to: (i) product elimination or substitution when a 
121 reasonable alternative to using PFAS is available in the industrial process; (ii) accidental 
122 discharge minimization; and (iii) equipment decontamination or replacement where PFAS 
123 products have historically been used. These industrial permittees shall include those that use or 
124 previously used PFAS or PFAS products or those where best management practices are 
125 warranted based on the department’s review of discharge monitoring unless the industrial 
126 permittee can show that the PFAS in the discharge entered the facility the local water supply and 
127 not the manufacturing process. 
128  (c) The department of environmental protection shall include effluent limitations and 
129 treatment requirements for PFAS in groundwater discharge permits upon renewal.  
130  SECTION 3. The department of environmental protection shall promulgate regulations to 
131 implement a schedule for phasing out the use, sale, or distribution, or offer for use, sale, or 
132 distribution of sludge without the department’s site-specific approval in the commonwealth, and 
133 shall not include the disposal or placement of sludge at a solid waste landfill, hazardous waste 
134 landfill or sludge landfill. For the purposes of this section, “sludge” shall mean the solid, semi 
135 solid, and liquid residue that results from a process of wastewater treatment or drinking water 
136 treatment, and does not include grit, screening, or grease and oil removed at the headworks of a 
137 wastewater or drinking water facility. 

8 of 30 138  SECTION 4. Not later than December 31, 2030, the department of environmental 
139 protection shall submit a report to the Chairs of the Joint Committee on Public Health and the 
140 Joint Committee on Environment and Natural Resources regarding its progress in establishing 
141 standards to monitor PFAS in ambient air. This report shall include, but not be limited to: (i) the 
142 department’s capacity to establish these standards; (ii) the steps the department has taken or 
143 plans to take to establish these standards; and; (iii) a projected timeline detailing when the 
144 department expects to finish establishing standards to monitor PFAS in ambient air.    
145  SECTION 5. Chapter 21A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
146 section 28 the following section:-  
147  Section 29. (a) The department, in consultation with the department of public health, shall 
148 develop and implement a multilingual public awareness campaign  to promote the education of 
149 Massachusetts residents, including environmental justice populations, of  per- and 
150 polyfluoroalkyl substances contamination across the commonwealth and potential health impacts 
151 of PFAS exposure. The campaign shall include the development and distribution of educational 
152 materials, drafted in plain language to the extent possible, the content of which shall include, but 
153 not be limited to: (i) the potential health impacts  of PFAS exposure; (ii) the routes of PFAS 
154 exposure, including but not limited to, drinking water, groundwater, surface water, wastewater, 
155 land application of biosolids, landfills, air, and fish tissue; (iii) consumer products that are known 
156 to contain PFAS; (iv) PFAS in Class B firefighting foam; (v) a list of facilities that are known 
157 and potential sources of PFAS and are required to prepare a toxics use reduction plan for PFAS 
158 within 10 miles of the environmental justice populations; (vi) assistance programs for PFAS 
159 remediation; (vii) citizen involvement pursuant to G.L. c. 21I, § 18; and (viii) assistance 
160 programs for PFAS remediation.  

9 of 30 161  (b) The educational materials shall be translated into the native languages spoken by the 
162 impacted environmental justice populations based on the federal census definition of English 
163 isolation. Such educational materials shall be made available to, but not be limited to: (i) 
164 community centers; (ii) health care centers; (iii) schools, (iv) places of worship; (v) the 
165 department of education; (vi) and the department of early education and care. 
166  (c) The department may contract or associate with public and private agencies and 
167 organizations for the preparation of said educational materials on PFAS exposure, other pertinent 
168 resource information on the matter of PFAS contamination and conducting educational 
169 programs. The department may use funds from the Fund, as established in section 35TTT of 
170 chapter 10 of the general laws, for such contracts.  
171  SECTION 6. Chapter 111 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
172 section 5S the following sections:-  
173  Section 5T. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall, unless the context 
174 clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:-  
175  “Agricultural products”, any vegetable, fruit, dairy, meat, fish, and poultry, and 
176 agricultural inputs, such as, but not limited to, feed, water, fertilizer, pesticides, produced and 
177 sold commercially in Massachusetts. 
178  “Department”, the department of public health 
179  “Food package", a package or packaging component that is intended for the marketing, 
180 protection or handling of a product intended for direct food contact or used to store food and 
181 foodstuffs for sale.  

10 of 30 182  “Fully Fluorinated Carbon Atom", a carbon atom on which all the hydrogen substituents 
183 have been replaced by fluorine. 
184  “Intentionally added”, PFAS that is added to a product, or enters the product from the 
185 manufacturing or processing of that product; the addition of which is known or reasonably 
186 ascertainable by the manufacturer. “Intentionally added” PFAS also includes any degradation by-
187 products of PFAS or the use of PFAS or PFAS precursors as a processing agent, mold release 
188 agent, or the creation of PFAS via chemical reactions. 
189  “Ingredient”, has the same meaning as that term is defined in subdivision (e) of Section 
190 700.3 of Part 700  of Chapter 1 of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations and does not 
191 include any incidental ingredient as defined in subdivision (l) of Section 701.3 of Part 701 of 
192 Chapter 1 of Title 21 of the Code of Federal  Regulations. 
193  "Known or reasonably ascertainable”, all information in a person's possession or control, 
194 plus all information that a reasonable person similarly situated might be expected to possess, 
195 control, or know.  
196  "Manufacturer", a person, firm, association, partnership, government entity, organization, 
197 joint venture or corporation that applies a package to a product for distribution or sale, or any 
198 person whose name appears on the label of a cosmetics product pursuant to  the requirements of 
199 Section 701.12 of Title 21 of the Code of Federal Regulations.  
200  "Package", a container providing a means of marketing, protecting or handling a product 
201 which shall include a unit package, an intermediate package, a package used for shipping or 
202 transport and unsealed receptacles such as carrying cases, crates, cups, pails, rigid foil and other 
203 trays, wrappers and wrapping films, bags and tubs.  

11 of 30 204  "Packaging component", an individual assembled part of a package including, but not 
205 limited to, any interior or exterior blocking, bracing, cushioning, weatherproofing, exterior 
206 strapping, coatings, closures, inks and labels.  
207  "Per- and polyfluoroalkyl substances" or “PFAS”, a class of fluorinated organic 
208 chemicals containing at least one fully fluorinated carbon atom.   
209  (b) No manufacturer shall sell, offer for sale, distribute for sale, or distribute for use in 
210 the commonwealth food packaging to which PFAS have been intentionally added in any amount.  
211  (c) The department, in consultation with department of environmental protection and the 
212 department of agricultural resources, shall procure or otherwise employ an external research 
213 organization, which has the capacity to study per- and polyfluoroalkyl substances and the effect 
214 PFAS has on agricultural products produced and sold in the commonwealth; provided, that the 
215 research organization shall have: (1) extensive experience with a wide variety of agricultural 
216 products and environmental matrices, including, but not limited to, plants and animals; (2) a 
217 current QAPP (“Quality Assurance Project Plan”) through the United States Environmental 
218 Protection Agency; (3) current sampling and chain of custody protocols; (4) experience handling 
219 complex agricultural matrices; and (5) access to state-of-the art mass spectrometers. The study 
220 shall include findings on the levels of PFAS found in: (1) in agricultural products sold in 
221 Massachusetts stores; (2) locally sourced agricultural products; and (3) agricultural inputs 
222 including, but not limited to, feed, water, fertilizer, and pesticides. The department shall make 
223 said report publicly available with the department’s findings on the department’s website. The 
224 commissioner shall file a progress report in writing of the findings, including food and 
225 agricultural sources of contamination, within 365 days of the passage of this act; provided, that 

12 of 30 226 the report shall be filed with the house and senate committees on ways and means, the joint 
227 committee on environment and natural resources, the joint committee on public health, and the 
228 joint committee on agriculture on or before August 31, 2027. 
229  Section 5U. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall, unless the context 
230 clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:-   
231  “Child passenger restraint”, a child passenger restraint under G.L. c. 90, § 7AA.  
232  “Children’s product”, consumer products intended, made or marketed for use by 
233 children12 years of age or under , including: (i) toys; (ii) children’s clothing; (iii) children's 
234 cosmetics and personal care products; (iv) children's jewelry and novelty products; (v) children’s 
235 school supplies; (vi) children’s arts and crafts supplies, including model making supplies (vii) 
236 children’s bedding, furniture, and furnishings; (viii) child car seats; (ix) products to help a child 
237 with sucking or teething, or to facilitate sleep, relaxation, or the feeding of a child; (x) artificial 
238 turf fields installed on school properties, publicly owned properties, or intended for use by 
239 children under the age of 18; (xi) products that meet any of the following conditions: represented 
240 in its packaging, display, or advertising as appropriate for use by children, sold in conjunction 
241 with, attached to, or packaged together with other products that are packaged, displayed, or 
242 advertised as appropriate for use by children sold in a retail store, catalogue, or online website, in 
243 which a person exclusively offers for sale products that are packaged, displayed, or advertised as 
244 of 13 appropriate for use by children, or sold in a discrete portion of a retail store, catalogue, or 
245 online website, in which a person offers for sale products that are packaged, displayed, or 
246 advertised as appropriate for use by children; provided, however, that “children’s product” shall 
247 not include: (i) batteries; (ii) slings and catapults; (iii) sets of darts with metallic points; (iv) toy 

13 of 30 248 steam engines; (v) bicycles and tricycles; (vi) video toys that can be connected to video screen 
249 and are operated at a nominal voltage exceeding twenty-four volts; (vii) chemistry sets; (viii) 
250 consumer and children's electronic products, including but not limited to personal computers, 
251 audio and video equipment, calculators, wireless phones, game consoles, and handheld devices 
252 incorporating a video screen, used to access interactive software and their associated peripherals; 
253 (ix) interactive software, intended for leisure and entertainment, including computer games and 
254 their storage media, including compact disks; (x) BB guns, pellet guns and air rifles; (xi) snow 
255 sporting equipment, including skis, poles, boots, snow boards, sleds and bindings; (xii) roller 
256 skates; (xiii) scooters; (xiv) model rockets; (xv) athletic shoes with cleats or spikes; (xvi) 
257 pocketknives and multitools; (xvii) food and beverages and food and beverage packaging 
258 regulated by the United States Food and Drug Administration or the United States Department of 
259 Agriculture; (xviii) pharmaceutical products and biologics; and (xix) medical devices, as defined 
260 in the federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, U,S,C, 21 section 321(h)  
261  “Consumer product,” any article that, to any significant extent, is distributed in 
262 commerce for personal use or consumption by individuals. 
263  “Cookware”, durable houseware items that are used in homes and restaurants to prepare, 
264 dispense, or store food, foodstuffs or beverages, including, but not limited to, pots, pans, skillets, 
265 grills, baking sheets, baking molds, trays, bowls and cooking utensils.  
266  “Cosmetic”, means: (a) articles intended to be rubbed, poured, sprinkled or sprayed  on, 
267 introduced into or otherwise applied to the human body or any part thereof for cleansing,  
268 beautifying, promoting attractiveness or altering the appearance, including wigs, hairpieces and  

14 of 30 269 postiches; (b) articles intended for use as a component of any such articles; and (c) shall not 
270 include soap. 
271  “Current unavoidable uses”, a use of PFAS that the department has determined under this 
272 section to be: (i) essential for health, safety or the functioning of society; (ii) necessary for the 
273 proper operation and functionality of a product; and; (iii) for which safer chemical alternatives 
274 are not reasonably available.   
275  “Department”, the department of public health.  
276  “Distributor”, any person, firm or corporation who takes title to goods, produced either 
277 domestically or in a foreign country, purchased for resale or promotional purposes.  
278  “Fabric treatment”, a substance applied to fabric, carpets, rugs, shoes or textiles to impart 
279 characteristics, including, but not limited to, stain resistance or water resistance.   
280  “Fully fluorinated carbon atom”, a carbon atom on which all the hydrogen substituents 
281 have been replaced by fluorine. 
282  “Intentionally added”, PFAS that is added to a product, or enters the product from the 
283 manufacturing or processing of that product; the addition of which is known or reasonably 
284 ascertainable by the manufacturer. “Intentionally added” PFAS also includes any degradation by-
285 products of PFAS or the use of PFAS or PFAS precursors as a processing agent, mold release 
286 agent, or the creation of PFAS via chemical reactions. 
287  "Known or reasonably ascertainable”, all information in a person's possession or control, 
288 plus all information that a reasonable person similarly situated might be expected to possess, 
289 control, or know. 

15 of 30 290  “Manufacturer”, any person, firm or corporation that manufactures a product whose 
291 brand name is affixed to the product. In the case of a product imported into the United States, 
292 “manufacturer” includes the importer or first domestic distributor of the product if the person 
293 that manufactured or assembled or whose brand name is affixed to the product does not have a 
294 presence in the United States.  
295  “Per- and polyfluoroalkyl substances” or “PFAS”, a class of fluorinated organic 
296 chemicals containing at least one fully fluorinated carbon atom.  
297  “Personal care products”, articles intended to be rubbed, poured, sprinkled, or sprayed on, 
298 introduced into or otherwise applied to the human body for cleansing, beautifying, promoting 
299 attractiveness or altering the appearance. Personal care products shall include products such as 
300 skin moisturizers, perfumes, lipsticks, fingernail polishes, eye and facial makeup preparations, 
301 shampoos, permanent waves, hair colors, toothpastes, sunscreen, hair spray, shaving cream and 
302 deodorants, as well as any material intended for use as a component of a cosmetic product. 
303 Personal care products shall also include , but not be limited to, menstrual products such as 
304 sanitary napkins, menstrual underwear, tampons and underwear liners. Personal care products 
305 does not include a product that requires a prescription for distribution or dispensation. “Personal 
306 Care Products” does not include hydrofluorocarbon or hydrofluoroolefins used as propellants in 
307 personal care products.  
308  “Priority product,” any child passenger restraint, children’s product, cookware, fabric 
309 treatment, personal care products, rugs and carpets, textile, textile furnishings, or upholstered 
310 furniture.  

16 of 30 311  “Product component”, a component of a consumer product, including the product’s 
312 ingredients or a part of the product, regardless of whether the manufacturer of the consumer 
313 product is the manufacturer of the component.   
314  “Product label”, a display of written, printed or graphic material that appears on, or is 
315 affixed to, the exterior of a product, or its exterior container or wrapper that is visible to a 
316 consumer, if the product has an exterior container or wrapper.  
317  “Retailer”, any person, firm or corporation to whom a consumer product is delivered or 
318 sold, if such delivery or sale is for purposes of sale or distribution in commerce to purchasers 
319 who buy such product for purposes other than resale.  
320  “Rugs and carpets”, fabric used to or marketed to cover floors.  
321  “Textile”, any item made in whole or part from a natural or synthetic fiber, yarn, or 
322 fabric. Textile includes but is not limited to leather, cotton, silk, jute, hemp, wool, viscose, nylon, 
323 and polyester. 
324  “Textile furnishings”, textile goods of a type customarily used in households and 
325 businesses, including but not limited to draperies, floor coverings, furnishings, bedding, towels, 
326 and tablecloths. 
327  “Upholstered furniture'', as defined in G.L. c. 94, § 270.  
328  “Wholesaler,” any person, firm or corporation to whom a consumer product is delivered 
329 or sold, if such delivery or sale is for purposes of sale or distribution in commerce to purchasers 
330 who buy such product for purposes of resale.  

17 of 30 331  (b) (1) No manufacturer, distributor, wholesaler or retailer shall offer for sale, sell or 
332 distribute in the commonwealth any priority products to which PFAS have been intentionally 
333 added on or after January 1, 2029.   
334  (2) The prohibitions of this subsection shall not apply to the sale or resale of used 
335 products; 
336   (c) (1) No manufacturer, distributor, wholesaler or retailer shall offer for sale, sell 
337 or distribute in the commonwealth any consumer product that the department has identified for 
338 restriction, including but not limited to priority products, to which PFAS have been intentionally 
339 added, unless the department, in consultation with the department of environmental protection 
340 and the Toxics Use Reduction Institute, has determined that the use of PFAS in the consumer 
341 product is a currently unavoidable use and grants a temporary exemption at intervals of no more 
342 than 6 years.  
343  (2)  The department may assess a fee to cover the department’s reasonable costs and to 
344 support the purposes outlined in this section  payable by a manufacturer, distributor, wholesaler 
345 or retailer upon submission of an unavoidable use exemption request under section (c) paragraph 
346 (5). Fees collected under this paragraph shall be deposited into the PFAS Public Health Trust 
347 Fund established under section (j) to be administered by the department for the purposes outlined 
348 in this section.  
349  (3)  In the event that the department makes such a determination and grants an 
350 unavoidable use exemption, the department may require the manufacturer, distributor, 
351 wholesaler or retailer to label the product or products in a form and manner determined by the 
352 department.    

18 of 30 353  (4) The prohibitions of this subsection shall not apply to the sale or resale of used 
354 consumer products or a product used in a manner that has been approved or authorized by a 
355 federal or state agency, including: (1) Drugs, medical devices, biologics or diagnostics approved 
356 or authorized by the Federal Food and Drug Administration or the United States Department of 
357 Agriculture or otherwise subject to regulation under the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, 
358 as amended, 21 U.S.C. § 301 et seq; (2) Packaging for drugs, medical devices, biologics, 
359 diagnostics or [non-pulp based packaging for] food approved or authorized by the Federal Food 
360 and Drug Administration or the United States Department of Agriculture or is otherwise in scope 
361 of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, as amended, 21 U.S.C. § 301 et seq (3) Products 
362 registered or authorized for use under the Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act, as 
363 amended, 7 U.S.C. § 136 et seq. (4) Substances designated by rulemaking or otherwise as 
364 acceptable substitutes in specific uses under U.S. EPA’s Significant New Alternatives Policy 
365 (SNAP) program, or substitutes needed to execute the American Innovation and Manufacturing 
366 (AIM) Act; and (5) Finished products certified or regulated by the Federal Aviation 
367 Administration or the Department of Defense, or both, when used in a manner that was certified 
368 or regulated by such agencies, including parts, materials, and processes when used to 
369 manufacture or maintain such regulated or certified finished products. 
370  (5) Consumer products or product categories in which the use of PFAS is a currently 
371 unavoidable use, as determined by the department, may be exempted for a fee to cover the 
372 department’s reasonable costs and to support the  purposes outlined in this section, pursuant to a 
373 process established years. Fees collected under this paragraph shall be deposited into the PFAS 
374 Public Health Trust Fund established under section (j) to be administered by the department for 
375 the purposes outlined in this section.  

19 of 30 376  (6)  Annually, not later than December 31, the department shall file a report on the 
377 manufacturers, distributors, wholesalers or retailers submitting unavoidable use exemption 
378 requests with the clerks of the house of representatives and the senate, the joint committee on 
379 public health, and shall make the report available on the department’s website. The report shall 
380 include, but not be limited to: (i) the full name of the manufacturer, distributor, wholesaler or 
381 retailer applying for an unavoidable use exemption; (ii) if the department granted the 
382 manufacturer, distributor, wholesaler or retailer an exemption or not; (iii) the department's 
383 reasoning for granting the exemption; and (iv) the length of the exemption.   
384  (d)(1) The department shall, in consultation with the department of environmental 
385 protection and the Toxics Use Reduction Institute, prepare a study of significant PFAS uses in 
386 consumer products not subject to this section using publicly available information, within 4 years 
387 of the passage of this law, and shall update the study within 7 years of the passage of this law. 
388 The study shall consider whether: (i) safer alternatives to PFAS are reasonably available; (ii) the 
389 function provided by PFAS in the product is necessary for the product to perform its primary 
390 function as determined by the department; and (iii) the use of PFAS in the product is essential for 
391 health or safety. The report shall recommend additional products and product categories to be 
392 considered for restriction under this section.  
393  (d)(2) The department may adopt regulations to implement this section. The department 
394 may adopt regulations to establish additional consumer products and product components to be 
395 considered priority products covered by this section. In identifying additional product categories 
396 for analysis, the department shall consult with Toxics Use Reduction Institute and the department 
397 of environmental protection. 

20 of 30 398  (e) The attorney general shall have the authority to enforce the provisions of this section 
399 pursuant to G.L. c. 93A, § 4.  
400  (f) (1) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the department of 
401 public health shall establish, on or before June 1, 2028, a publicly accessible reporting platform 
402 to collect information about per- and polyfluoroalkyl substances, or “PFAS”, and consumer 
403 products or product components containing PFAS being sold, offered for sale, distributed or 
404 offered for promotional purposes in, or imported into, the state. The department may consult 
405 with Interstate Chemicals Clearinghouse and may collaborate with other states with prohibitions 
406 on PFAS to establish such a platform.   
407  (2) On or before June 1, 2028, and on or before June 1 of each year thereafter, a 
408 manufacturer of PFAS or a consumer product or product component containing intentionally 
409 added PFAS that is sold, offered for sale, distributed or offered for promotional purposes in, or 
410 imported into, the state shall register the PFAS or the consumer product or product component 
411 containing intentionally added PFAS on the publicly accessible reporting platform created 
412 pursuant to paragraph (1), along with all of the following information, as applicable: (i) the name 
413 and type of consumer product or product component containing intentionally added PFAS; (ii) 
414 the universal product code, or “UPC,” of the consumer product or product component containing 
415 intentionally added PFAS; (iii) the name and address of the manufacturer, and the name, address 
416 and phone number of the contact person for the manufacturer; and (iv) any additional 
417 information established by the department as necessary to implement the requirements of this 
418 section.   

21 of 30 419  (3) A manufacturer may supply the information required in paragraph (2) for a category 
420 or type of consumer product rather than for each individual product. 
421  (4) In a manner determined by the department, a manufacturer shall update and revise the 
422 information required under paragraph (2) whenever there is a significant change in the 
423 information or when requested to do so by the department.   
424  (5) The department may establish by regulation and assess a fee payable by a 
425 manufacturer upon submission of the notification required under paragraph (2) to cover the 
426 department’s reasonable costs in developing and administering this section and to support the 
427 purposes outlined in this section collected under this paragraph shall be deposited into the PFAS 
428 Public Health Trust Fund established under section (j) to be administered by the department for 
429 the purposes outlined in this section.   
430  (6) Any information submitted to, or developed by, the department in furtherance of this 
431 section, except for the specific information required to be disclosed in subsection (f)(2) of this 
432 section shall not be a public record and shall be exempt from disclosure under clause twenty-
433 sixth of section 7 of chapter 4 and section 10 of chapter 66 of the General Laws. 
434  (g) (1) A manufacturer of consumer products registered under paragraph (2) of subsection 
435 (f) shall send an electronic notification to distributors and wholesalers of the consumer product 
436 that the consumer product contains PFAS.  
437  (2) A distributor or wholesaler who receives a notification pursuant to paragraph (1) shall 
438 send an electronic notification to retailers of the consumer product that the consumer product 
439 contains PFAS.  

22 of 30 440  (3) The department shall adopt regulations to implement this subsection.  
441  (4) The attorney general shall have the authority to enforce the provisions of this 
442 subsection under G.L. c. 93A, § 4.  
443   (h) (1) A manufacturer of any priority products that are sold, offered for sale, 
444 distributed or offered for promotional purposes in, or imported into, the state shall establish an 
445 audit program to test for the presence of unintentionally added PFAS using analytical methods 
446 approved by the department in consultation with the department of environmental protection and 
447 the Toxics Use Reduction Institute.  
448  (2) The department shall establish by regulation and assess a fee payable by a 
449 manufacturer under paragraph (1) to cover the department’s reasonable costs in testing a 
450 consumer product for the presence of unintentionally added PFAS at the request of a 
451 manufacturer. Fees collected under this paragraph shall be deposited into the PFAS Public 
452 Health Trust Fund established under section (j) to be administered by the department for the 
453 purposes outlined in this section.   
454  (i) (1) There shall be a PFAS Public Health Trust Fund. Expenditures from the fund shall 
455 be made by the department, without further appropriation and consistent with this section, and 
456 consistent with the terms of other allocations and monies transferred to this fund, as applicable. 
457 The commissioner shall administer the fund for purposes outlined in this section, and may make 
458 expenditures from the fund to develop and implement a multilingual outreach and education 
459 campaign pursuant to section 29 of chapter 21A of the General Laws.  
460  (2) The fund shall be expended to support the education of Massachusetts residents of 
461 PFAS contamination across the commonwealth and the potential health impacts of PFAS 

23 of 30 462 exposure, to mitigate the impacts of PFAS in consumer products in the commonwealth, and to 
463 support the development of PFAS-free alternatives by the Toxic Use Reduction Institute. The 
464 commissioner shall make necessary expenditures from this account for the shared administrative 
465 costs of the operations and programs of the department related to the fund, including but not 
466 limited to the unavoidable use exemption process under section (c) paragraph (5) and the testing 
467 a consumer product for the presence of unintentionally added PFAS. The commissioner shall 
468 further direct that monies from the fund shall be expended to provide services in an amount 
469 reasonably related to such administrative costs. No expenditure shall be made from the fund that 
470 would cause the fund to be in deficit at the close of a fiscal year. Amounts credited to the fund 
471 shall not be subject to further appropriation and monies remaining in the fund at the end of the 
472 fiscal year shall not revert to the General Fund, but shall instead be available for expenditure 
473 during subsequent fiscal years. Any fiscal year-end balance in the fund shall be excluded from 
474 the calculation of the consolidated net surplus pursuant to section 5C of chapter 29 of the 
475 General Laws.   
476  (3) There shall be credited to the fund: (i) fees payable by a manufacturer, distributor, 
477 wholesaler or retailer upon submission of an unavoidable use exemption request under section 
478 (c) paragraph (5); (ii) transfers from other funds authorized by the general court and so 
479 designated; (iii) funds from public or private sources, including, but not limited to, gifts, grants, 
480 donations, rebates, settlements, judgments, awards, and other allocations received by the 
481 commonwealth designated to the fund; and (iv) any interest earned on such amounts. 
482  SECTION 7. Chapter 111 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
483 section 244 the following sections:-  

24 of 30 484   Section 245. (a) The following terms shall, unless the context clearly requires 
485 otherwise, have the following meanings:-  
486  “Firefighting personal protective equipment” means any clothing designed, intended or 
487 marketed to be worn by firefighting personnel in the performance of their duties, designed with 
488 the intent for the use in fire and rescue activities, including but not limited to: jackets, pants, 
489 shoes/boots, gloves, helmets and respiratory equipment.  
490  “Intentionally added”, PFAS that is added to a product, or enters the product from the 
491 manufacturing or processing of that product; the addition of which is known or reasonably 
492 ascertainable by the manufacturer. “Intentionally added” PFAS also includes any degradation by-
493 products of PFAS or the use of PFAS or PFAS precursors as a processing agent, mold release 
494 agent, or the creation of PFAS via chemical reactions. 
495  "Known or reasonably ascertainable”, all information in a person's possession or control, 
496 plus all information that a reasonable person similarly situated might be expected to possess, 
497 control, or know. 
498  “Local governments” includes any county, city, town, fire district, regional fire protection 
499 authority, or special purpose district that provides firefighting services.  
500  “Manufacturer”, any person, firm or corporation that manufactures or distributes 
501 firefighting agents or firefighting equipment. In the case of a product imported into the United 
502 States, “manufacturer” includes the importer or first domestic distributor of the product if the 
503 person that manufactured or assembled or whose brand name is affixed to the product does not 
504 have a presence in the United States.  

25 of 30 505  "Per- and polyfluoroalkyl substances" or “PFAS”, a class of fluorinated organic 
506 chemicals containing at least one fully fluorinated carbon atom.  
507  (b) (1) A manufacturer or other person that sells firefighting personal protective 
508 equipment containing PFAS to any person, local government or state agency shall provide 
509 written notice to the purchaser at the time of sale: (i) that the firefighting personal protective 
510 equipment contains PFAS;  (ii) the reason PFAS are added to the equipment; and (iii) the 
511 specific PFAS within the product listed by chemical name and abbreviated name.  
512  (2) The manufacturer or other person selling firefighting personal protective equipment 
513 and the purchaser of the equipment shall retain a copy of the notice required pursuant to this 
514 subsection on file for at least 3 years from the date of the purchase. Upon the request of the 
515 department, a person, manufacturer, or purchaser shall furnish the notice, or written copies, and 
516 associated sales documentation to the department within 60 days of such request.  
517  SECTION 8. Said section 246 of said chapter 111 of the General Laws, is hereby 
518 amended by striking out subsection (b) and inserting in place thereof the following subsection:-  
519  (b) A manufacturer or other person that sells firefighting personal protective equipment to 
520 any person, local government, or state agency shall not manufacture, knowingly sell, offer for 
521 sale, distribute for sale, or distribute for use in the commonwealth any firefighting personal 
522 protective equipment containing intentionally added PFAS.  
523  SECTION 9. Chapter 22D of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
524 section 6 the following sections:- 

26 of 30 525  Section 7. (a) The following terms shall, unless the context clearly requires otherwise, 
526 have the following meanings: 
527  “Department”, department of fire services 
528  “Intentionally added”, PFAS that is added to a product, or enters the product from the 
529 manufacturing or processing of that product; and the addition of PFAS is known or reasonably 
530 ascertainable by the manufacturer. “Intentionally added” PFAS also includes any degradation by-
531 products of PFAS or the use of PFAS or PFAS precursors as a processing agent, mold release 
532 agent, or the creation of PFAS via chemical reactions. 
533  "Known or reasonably ascertainable”, all information in a person's possession or control, 
534 plus all information that a reasonable person similarly situated might be expected to possess, 
535 control, or know. 
536  "Per- and polyfluoroalkyl substances" or “PFAS”, a class of fluorinated organic 
537 chemicals containing at least one fully fluorinated carbon atom.  
538  (b) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, no person, local 
539 government or state agency shall use a Class B firefighting foam that contains intentionally 
540 added PFAS in any amount for training or testing purposes.   
541  (c) Any person, unit of local government, fire department, or state agency that discharges 
542 or releases Class B firefighting foam that contains intentionally added PFAS must notify the 
543 department of environmental protection’s emergency response line as soon as possible but no 
544 later than within 24 hours of the discharge or release.   

27 of 30 545  (d) The department shall assist the department of public health’s Occupational Health 
546 Surveillance Program in collecting data on occupational exposure to PFAS, including, but not 
547 limited to, firefighters. The restrictions in subsections (b) and (c) of this section do not apply to 
548 any manufacture, sale, or distribution of class B firefighting foam where the inclusion of PFAS 
549 chemicals are required by federal law, including but not - limited to the requirements of 14 
550 C.F.R. 139.317, as that section existed as of January 1, 2025. In the event that applicable federal 
551 regulations change after January 1, 2025, to allow the use of alternative firefighting agents that 
552 do not contain PFAS chemicals, the restrictions set forth in subsections (b) and (c) shall apply.   
553  SECTION 10. Section 12 of chapter 61A of the General Laws is hereby amended by 
554 inserting after the second paragraph the following paragraph:- 
555  No conveyance tax under this section shall be assessed on land that is removed from 
556 agricultural or horticultural use due to regulatory action regarding the actual or suspected 
557 presence of PFAS in soil, water, or agricultural products derived from such land. For the 
558 purposes of this paragraph, “PFAS” shall mean a class of fluorinated organic compounds 
559 containing at least one fully fluorinated carbon atom. The commissioner of agricultural 
560 resources, in consultation with the commissioner of revenue and the commissioner of 
561 environmental protection, may promulgate regulations to enforce this paragraph.  
562  SECTION 11. Section 13 of chapter 61A of the General Laws is hereby amended by 
563 adding the following subsection:- 
564  (e) No roll-back tax imposed by this section shall be assessed on land that no longer 
565 meets the definition of land actively devoted to agricultural, horticultural or agricultural and 
566 horticultural use due to regulatory action regarding the actual or suspected presence of PFAS in 

28 of 30 567 soil, water, or agricultural products derived from such land. For the purposes of this subsection, 
568 “PFAS” shall mean a class of fluorinated organic compounds containing at least one fully 
569 fluorinated carbon atom. The commissioner of agricultural resources, in consultation with the 
570 commissioner of revenue and the commissioner of environmental protection, may promulgate 
571 regulations to enforce this subsection.  
572  SECTION 12. The department of public health, in consultation with department of 
573 environmental protection and the department of agricultural resources, shall procure or otherwise 
574 employ an external research organization, which has the capacity to study per- and 
575 polyfluoroalkyl substances and the effect PFAS has on agricultural products produced and sold 
576 in the commonwealth; provided, that the research organization shall have: (1) extensive 
577 experience with a wide variety of agricultural products and environmental matrices, including, 2 
578 of 2 but not limited to, plants and animals; (2) a current QAPP (“Quality Assurance Project 
579 Plan”) through the United States Environmental Protection Agency; (3) current sampling and 
580 chain of custody protocols; (4) experience handling complex agricultural matrices; and (5) access 
581 to state of-the art mass spectrometers. The study shall include findings on the levels of PFAS 
582 found in: (1) in agricultural products sold in Massachusetts stores; (2) locally sourced 
583 agricultural products; and (3) agricultural inputs including, but not limited to, feed, water, 
584 fertilizer, and pesticides. The department shall make said report publicly available with the 
585 department’s findings on the department’s website. The commissioner shall file a progress report 
586 in writing of the findings, including food and agricultural sources of contamination, within 365 
587 days of the passage of this act; provided, that the report shall be filed with the house and senate 
588 committees on ways and means, the joint committee on environment and natural resources, the 

29 of 30 589 joint committee on public health, and the joint committee on agriculture on or before August 31, 
590 2025.  
591  SECTION 13. Subsection (c) of said section 43B of said chapter 21 shall take effect two 
592 years after United States Environmental Protection Agency Method 1633 is available to the 
593 public.  
594  SECTION 14. Section 3 shall take effect January 1, 2030. 
595  SECTION 15. Section 5T of said chapter 111 shall take effect January 1, 2030.  
596  SECTION 16. Subsection (b) of said section 5U of said chapter 111 shall take effect 
597 January 1, 2029.  
598  SECTION 17. Subsection (c) of said section 5U of said chapter 111 shall take effect 
599 January 1, 2035.  
600  SECTION 18. Paragraph (1) of said subsection (g) of said section 5U of said chapter 111 
601 shall take effect June 1, 2030.  
602  SECTION 19. Subsection (h) of said section 5U of said chapter 111 shall take effect 
603 January 1, 2030.  
604  SECTION 20. Subsection (i) of said section 5U of said chapter 111 shall take effect 
605 January 1, 2035.  
606  SECTION 21.  Section 245 of said chapter 111 shall take effect on the 180th day 
607 following enactment.  
608  SECTION 22. Section 246 of said chapter 111 shall take effect January 1, 2028.  

30 of 30 609  SECTION 23. Section 3 shall take effect on the 180th day following enactment. 
610  SECTION 24. Section 7 shall take effect January 1, 2029. 
611  SECTION 25. Section 12 shall take effect no later than 180 days after passage of this act.